en: Mechanical loom assembly status: Fully assembled; Partially assembled; Pre-warped / ready to weave; Unassembled / requires assembly; Other
ro-RO: Starea asamblării războiului de țesut mecanic: Asamblat complet; Asamblat parțial; Urzit în prealabil / gata de țesut; Neasamblat / necesită asamblare; Altele
pl: Stan złożenia krosna mechanicznego: W pełni złożone; Częściowo złożone; Z osnową / gotowe do tkania; Niezłożone / wymaga montażu; Inne
el: Κατάσταση συναρμολόγησης μηχανικού αργαλειού: Πλήρως συναρμολογημένο; Μερικώς συναρμολογημένο; Προ-στημονιασμένο / έτοιμο για ύφανση; Ασυναρμολόγητο / απαιτεί συναρμολόγηση; Άλλο
lt-LT: Mechaninių staklių surinkimo būsena: Visiškai surinkta; Iš dalies surinkta; Iš anksto apmesta / paruošta austi; Nesurinkta / reikia surinkti; Kita
tr: Mekanik dokuma tezgahı montaj durumu: Tam monte edilmiş; Kısmen monte edilmiş; Önceden çözgülü / dokumaya hazır; Demonte / montaj gerektirir; Diğer
de: Montagezustand des mechanischen Webstuhls: Vollständig montiert; Teilmontiert; Vorgeschärt / webfertig; Unmontiert / Montage erforderlich; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Stanje sestavljenosti mehanske statve: Povsem sestavljeno; Delno sestavljeno; Predpripravljena osnova / pripravljeno za tkanje; Nesestavljeno / zahteva sestavljanje; Drugo
ru: Статус сборки механического ткацкого станка: Полностью в сборе; Частично в сборе; С заправленной основой / готов к ткачеству; В разобранном виде / требует сборки; Другое
pt-BR: Tear mecânico status de montagem: Totalmente montado; Parcialmente montado; Pré-urdido / pronto para tecer; Desmontado / requer montagem; Outro
it: Stato di assemblaggio del telaio meccanico: Completamente assemblato; Parzialmente assemblato; Pre-ordito / pronto per tessere; Da assemblare / richiede montaggio; Altro
zh-CN: 机械织机组装状态: 完全组装; 部分组装; 已穿经/可直接编织; 未组装/需要组装; 其他
hu: Mechanikus szövőszék összeszereltségi állapota: Teljesen összeszerelt; Részben összeszerelt; Előfelvetett / szövésre kész; Szétszerelt / összeszerelést igényel; Egyéb
fi: Koneellisten kangaspuiden kokoamistila: Täysin koottu; Osittain koottu; Loimitettu / valmiina kudontaan; Kokoamaton / vaatii kokoamisen; Muu
sk-SK: Stav zostavenia mechanického tkáčskeho stavu: Úplne zmontované; Čiastočne zmontované; Predosnované / pripravené na tkanie; Nezmontované / vyžaduje sa montáž; Iné
pt-PT: Estado da montagem do tear mecânico: Totalmente montado; Parcialmente montado; Pré-urdido/pronto a tecer; Desmontado/requer montagem; Outro
nb: Monteringsstatus for mekanisk vev: Ferdig montert; Delvis montert; Forhåndsrennet / klar til veving; Umontert / krever montering; Annet
sv: Monteringsstatus för mekanisk vävstol: Helt monterad; Delvis monterad; Förvarpad/redo att väva; Omonterad/kräver montering; Annat
ko: 기계식 직기 조립 상태: 완전 조립됨; 부분 조립됨; 사전 경사 작업됨/직조 준비 완료; 미조립/조립 필요; 기타
da: Status for montering af maskinvæv: Fuldt samlet; Delvist samlet; Trendet / klar til vævning; Usamlet / kræver samling; Andet
zh-TW: 機械織布機組裝狀態: 完全組裝; 部分組裝; 預先整經/可直接編織; 未組裝/需組裝; 其他
cs: Stav sestavy mechanického tkalcovského stavu: Plně sestavené; Částečně sestavené; Předpřipravené osnovou / připravené k tkaní; Nesestavené / vyžaduje sestavení; Jiné
bg-BG: Състояние на сглобката на механичен стан: Напълно сглобен; Частично сглобен; Предварително снуван / готов за тъкане; Несглобен / изисква сглобяване; Друго
es: Estado del ensamblaje del telar mecánico: Completamente ensamblado; Parcialmente ensamblado; Preurdido/listo para tejer; Desmontado/requiere ensamblaje; Otro
th: สถานะการประกอบเครื่องทอผ้าเชิงกล: ประกอบเสร็จสมบูรณ์; ประกอบบางส่วน; ขึ้นเส้นด้ายล่วงหน้า / พร้อมทอ; ไม่ได้ประกอบ / ต้องประกอบ; อื่นๆ
fr: État d’assemblage du métier à tisser mécanique: Entièrement assemblé; Partiellement assemblé; Pré-ourdi / prêt à tisser; Non assemblé / nécessite un assemblage; Autre
vi: Trạng thái lắp ráp máy dệt cơ khí: Lắp ráp hoàn thiện; Lắp ráp một phần; Mắc sợi sẵn / sẵn sàng dệt; Chưa lắp ráp / cần lắp ráp; Khác
ja: 機械織機組み立て状況: 組み立て済み; 一部組み立て済み; 整経済み / 織れる状態; 未組み立て / 要組み立て; その他
nl: Mechanisch weefgetouw montagestatus: Volledig gemonteerd; Gedeeltelijk gemonteerd; Voorgeschoren / klaar om te weven; Niet-gemonteerd / vereist montage; Overige
hr-HR: Status sklopa mehaničkog tkalačkog stana: Potpuno sastavljeno; Djelomično sastavljeno; S unaprijed postavljenom osnovom / spremno za tkanje; Nesastavljeno / potrebno sastaviti; Ostalo